Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-466
Aquaculture permit; rights.

A holder of an aquaculture permit may import aquatic organisms, lawfully held in possession in any other state or country, into this state except as provided in sections 37-547 to 37-550.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VII, § 5, p. 439;

C.S.1929, § 37-705;

R.S.1943, § 37-705;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 19, p. 473;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 18, p. 591;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 45;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 718, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-705;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 176;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 50.